Tennessee, session 114, HB0684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-318, is amended by deleting
subsections (b) and (c) and substituting:
(b) The department shall annually identify any federal waivers it deems
necessary to alleviate any federal regulatory limitations it identifies pursuant to
subsection (a), and shall, no later than October 31 of each year, as applicable, submit
applications to the federal government for such waivers.
(c) On or before December 31 of each year, the department shall submit a report
to the chair of the health and welfare committee of the senate, the chair of the committee
of the house of representatives with subject matter jurisdiction over health, and the
legislative librarian that details its findings pursuant to subsection (a), describes any
waiver applications it has submitted pursuant to subsection (b) and the status of such
applications, and includes recommendations to the general assembly for any statutory
changes the department deems necessary to facilitate efficient processing and approval
of applications and delivery of benefits for the food assistance program.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0684
002798
- 1 -